Maryland, session 2025, SB0033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Office of the Comptroller and the Department of Legislative Services shall
study and make recommendations regarding the State’s current business tax structure and
changes to the State’s business tax structure to provide fair and equitable taxation for all
corporations and other business entities doing business in the State.
(b) In conducting the study, the Office of the Comptroller and the Department of
Legislative Services shall review and evaluate the following:
(1) the imposition of combined reporting using the “water’s edge method”
under the corporate income tax for unitary groups of affiliated corporations;
(2) the experiences and outcomes of the states that have already
implemented combined reporting;
(3) the effects of implementing combined reporting on different industries;
(4) the imposition of other types of business taxes, in lieu of or in addition
to the current taxes imposed, including gross receipts taxes, value added taxes, and
alternative minimum taxes; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0033*

SENATE BILL 33
(5) improved methods for evaluation of the effectiveness and efficiency of
tax policies intended as economic development incentives.
(c) On or before December 15, 2026, the Office of the Comptroller and the
Department of Legislative Services shall report their findings and recommendations to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the General
Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.